Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Chapter 7.1. Faith-Based and Community Initiatives.

§ 63.2-703.
Faith-based and community initiatives; responsibilities of Department.

The General Assembly finds that faith-based, volunteer, private and community organizations make significant contributions to the welfare of our society and constitute an underutilized and underrepresented reservoir of assistance for social programs, and special efforts to increase utilization of faith-based, volunteer, private and community organizations will enhance the Commonwealth’s ability to carry out human welfare programs. To carry out these initiatives, the Department of Social Services shall have the following responsibilities:

Lead and facilitate meetings as necessary, with faith-based, volunteer, private and community organizations for the purpose of sharing information to help carry out human welfare programs in Virginia;

Encourage conferences and meetings at the community level for faith-based, volunteer, private and community organizations, as needed;

Provide procurement and funding information to faith-based, volunteer, private and community organizations, as needed;

Provide information regarding faith-based and community initiatives and other information the Department may deem appropriate, to faith-based, volunteer, private and community organizations, and other state agencies whose missions may be enhanced by increased awareness of such initiatives and information;

Encourage the development and maintenance of a statewide network of local liaisons to assist in the dissemination of information and assistance;

Develop a statewide list of available faith-based, volunteer, private and community organizations. Such statewide list shall be made available to the public through the Department’s website;

Obtain information concerning faith-based, volunteer, private and community organizations in other states;

Coordinate offers of assistance from faith-based organizations during natural disasters; and

Perform such other duties as the Department deems appropriate.

Nothing in this section shall imply or be inferred to mean that additional federal or state funds will be available for these purposes or that contractual preferences will be given to such organizations other than past or potential performance standards utilized under the Virginia Public Procurement Act (§

2.2-4300

et seq.).

History.

2002, c. 326, § 63.1-133.59; 2006, cc. 142, 386; 2016, c. 23.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2002, c. 326, enacted a new Chapter 6.7 in Title 63.1 consisting of a section numbered 63.1-133.59, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, Acts 2002, c. 326 has been given effect in Chapter 7.1 of Title 63.2 and this section as set out above.

Effective date.

This title became effective October 1, 2002.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 142 and 386 are identical, and rewrote subdivision A 8, wich read: “Conduct a survey of local departments of social services, community action agencies, and other appropriate entities by July 1, 2004, to collect information on unmet social service needs of Temporary Assistance to Needy Families recipients.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 23 deleted subdivision A 9, which read “Make regular reports to the Governor and General Assembly on the fulfillment of the Department’s responsibilities related to faith-based and community initiatives” and renumbered former subdivision A 10 as subdivision A 9.